Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 2, chapter 47, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) This section applies to  any meeting of [ the governing body of ] the following [ public
bodies]:
(a) The board of directors of  a common or union high school district;
(b) The board of directors of  an education service district;
(c) The board of education of  a community college district; or
(d) The board of trustees of  a public university described in ORS 352.002.
(2) A public body subject to this section must:
(a) Notwithstanding  ORS 192.650, make a video recording of [ all of its meetings ] the meetings
of the entity described in subsection (1) of this section that governs the public body ; and
(b) Within seven days following the meeting, post a video recording of the  meeting on the public
body’s website or social media site.
(3) If  the facilities of the public body lack broadband Internet access, the public body may
comply with this section by posting on the public body’s  website or social media site  an audio
recording of [ governing body ] meetings of the entity described in subsection (1)  of this section
that governs the public body  [ on the public body website or social media site ].
(4) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not apply to:
(a) Any meeting or portion of a meeting that is conducted in executive session; or
(b) A school district with a resident average daily membership of less than 50 students.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to section 2, chapter  47, Oregon Laws 2024, by section 1
of this  2025 Act apply to meetings of the entities described in section 2, chapter 47, Oregon
Laws 2024, as amended by section 1 of this 2025 Act, occurring on or after January 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1109 (SB 1109-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1109 (SB 1109-A) Page 2